waterfox/browser/locales/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX iJ Y 43
SFX iJ dormir dormir/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir po:infi
SFX iJ dormir dormant/n'q'd'l'm't's' dormir po:ppre
SFX iJ dormir dormi/L'D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX iJ dormir dormis/D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX iJ dormir dormie/L'D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iJ dormir dormies/D'Q' dormir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iJ dormir dors/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dort/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormons/n'q'l't' dormir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dorment/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dormais/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormions/n'q'l't' dormir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormaient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dormis/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormit/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormîmes/n'q'l't' dormir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormîtes/n'q'l'm' dormir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormirent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iJ dormir dormirai/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iJ dormir dormiras/n'q'l'm't' dormir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormira/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirons/n'q'l't' dormir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormirez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiront/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iJ dormir dormirais/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirait/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:cond po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormirions/n'q'l't' dormir po:cond po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiriez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:cond po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormiraient/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:cond po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dorme/j'n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormes/n'q'l'm't' dormir po:spre po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormisse/j'n'q'l'm't' dormir po:simp po:1sg
SFX iJ dormir dormisses/n'q'l'm't' dormir po:simp po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormît/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:simp po:3sg
SFX iJ dormir dormissions/n'q'l't' dormir po:simp po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormissiez/n'q'l'm' dormir po:simp po:2pl
SFX iJ dormir dormissent/n'q'l'm't's' dormir po:simp po:3pl
SFX iJ dormir dors/n'l'm't' dormir po:impe po:2sg
SFX iJ dormir dormons/n'l't' dormir po:impe po:1pl
SFX iJ dormir dormez/n'l'm' dormir po:impe po:2pl

SFX iK Y 42
SFX iK quérir quérir/n'q'd'l'm't's' quérir po:infi
SFX iK quérir quérant/n'q'd'l'm't's' quérir po:ppre
SFX iK quérir quis/L'D'Q' quérir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX iK quérir quise/L'D'Q' quérir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iK quérir quises/D'Q' quérir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iK quérir quiers/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quiert/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quérons/n'q'l't' quérir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quérez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quièrent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quérais/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quérait/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quérions/n'q'l't' quérir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quériez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quéraient/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quis/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quit/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quîmes/n'q'l't' quérir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quîtes/n'q'l'm' quérir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quirent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iK quérir querrai/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iK quérir querras/n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iK quérir querra/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iK quérir querrons/n'q'l't' quérir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iK quérir querrez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iK quérir querront/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iK quérir querrais/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iK quérir querrait/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:cond po:3sg
SFX iK quérir querrions/n'q'l't' quérir po:cond po:1pl
SFX iK quérir querriez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:cond po:2pl
SFX iK quérir querraient/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:cond po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quière/j'n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quières/n'q'l'm't' quérir po:spre po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quisse/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:simp po:1sg
SFX iK quérir quisses/n'q'l'm't' quérir po:simp po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quît/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:simp po:3sg
SFX iK quérir quissions/n'q'l't' quérir po:simp po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quissiez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:simp po:2pl
SFX iK quérir quissent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:simp po:3pl
SFX iK quérir quiers/n'l'm't' quérir po:impe po:2sg
SFX iK quérir quérons/n'l't' quérir po:impe po:1pl
SFX iK quérir quérez/n'l'm' quérir po:impe po:2pl

SFX iM Y 42
SFX iM quérir quérir/n'q'd'l'm't's' quérir po:infi
SFX iM quérir quérant/n'q'd'l'm't's' quérir po:ppre
SFX iM quérir quis/L'D'Q' quérir po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX iM quérir quise/L'D'Q' quérir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX iM quérir quises/D'Q' quérir po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX iM quérir quiers/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quiert/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipre po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quérons/n'q'l't' quérir po:ipre po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quérez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:ipre po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quièrent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quérais/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quérait/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:iimp po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quérions/n'q'l't' quérir po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quériez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quéraient/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:iimp po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quis/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quit/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quîmes/n'q'l't' quérir po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quîtes/n'q'l'm' quérir po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quirent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX iM quérir querrai/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ifut po:1sg
SFX iM quérir querras/n'q'l'm't' quérir po:ifut po:2sg
SFX iM quérir querra/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ifut po:3sg
SFX iM quérir querrons/n'q'l't' quérir po:ifut po:1pl
SFX iM quérir querrez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:ifut po:2pl
SFX iM quérir querront/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX iM quérir querrais/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX iM quérir querrait/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:cond po:3sg
SFX iM quérir querrions/n'q'l't' quérir po:cond po:1pl
SFX iM quérir querriez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:cond po:2pl
SFX iM quérir querraient/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:cond po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quière/j'n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quières/n'q'l'm't' quérir po:spre po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quisse/j'n'q'l'm't' quérir po:simp po:1sg
SFX iM quérir quisses/n'q'l'm't' quérir po:simp po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quît/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:simp po:3sg
SFX iM quérir quissions/n'q'l't' quérir po:simp po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quissiez/n'q'l'm' quérir po:simp po:2pl
SFX iM quérir quissent/n'q'l'm't's' quérir po:simp po:3pl
SFX iM quérir quiers/n'l'm't' quérir po:impe po:2sg
SFX iM quérir quérons/n'l't' quérir po:impe po:1pl
SFX iM quérir quérez/n'l'm' quérir po:impe po:2pl
